Missouri, session 2026, HB3334.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 307.175, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 307.175, to read as follows:
307.175. 1. Motor vehicles and equipment which are operated by any member of an
organized fire department, ambulance association, or rescue squad, including a canine
search and rescue team,whether paid or volunteer, may be operated on streets and highways
in this state as an emergency vehicle under the provisions of section 304.022 while
responding to a fire call [or], ambulance call, or an emergency call requiring search and
rescue operations, or at the scene of a fire call [or], ambulance call, or an emergency call
requiring search and rescue operations, and while using or sounding a warning siren and
using or displaying thereon fixed, flashing or rotating blue lights, but sirens and blue lights
shall be used only in bona fide emergencies.
2. (1) Notwithstanding subsection 1 of this section, the following vehicles may use or
display fixed, flashing, or rotating red or red and blue lights:
(a) Emergency vehicles, as defined in section 304.022, when responding to an
emergency;
(b) Vehicles operated as described in subsection 1 of this section;
(c) Vehicles and equipment owned or leased by a contractor or subcontractor
performing work for the department of transportation, except that the red or red and blue
lights shall be displayed on vehicles or equipment described in this paragraph only between
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3334 2
dusk and dawn, when such vehicles or equipment are stationary, such vehicles or equipment
are located in a work zone as defined in section 304.580, highway workers as defined in
section 304.580 are present, and such work zone is designated by a sign or signs. No more
than two vehicles or pieces of equipment in a work zone may display fixed, flashing, or
rotating lights under this subdivision;
(d) Vehicles and equipment owned, leased, or operated by a coroner, medical
examiner, or forensic investigator of the county medical examiner's office or a similar entity,
when responding to a crime scene, motor vehicle accident, workplace accident, or any
location at which the services of such professionals have been requested by a law
enforcement officer.
(2) The following vehicles and equipment may use or display fixed, flashing, or
rotating amber or amber and white lights:
(a) Vehicles and equipment owned or leased by the state highways and transportation
commission and operated by an authorized employee of the department of transportation;
(b) Vehicles and equipment owned or leased by a contractor or subcontractor
performing work for the department of transportation, except that the amber or amber and
white lights shall be displayed on vehicles described in this paragraph only when such
vehicles or equipment are located in a work zone as defined in section 304.580, highway
workers as defined in section 304.580 are present, and such work zone is designated by a sign
or signs;
(c) Vehicles and equipment operated by a utility worker performing work for the
utility, except that the amber or amber and white lights shall be displayed on vehicles
described in this paragraph only when such vehicles are stationary, such vehicles or
equipment are located in a work zone as defined in section 304.580, a utility worker is
present, and such work zone is designated by a sign or signs. As used in this paragraph, the
term "utility worker" means any employee while in performance of his or her job duties,
including any person employed under contract of a utility that provides gas, heat, electricity,
water, steam, telecommunications or cable services, or sewer services, whether privately,
municipally, or cooperatively owned.
3. Permits for the operation of such vehicles equipped with sirens or blue lights shall
be in writing and shall be issued and may be revoked by the chief of an organized fire
department, organized ambulance association, rescue squad, or the state highways and
transportation commission and no person shall use or display a siren or blue lights on a motor
vehicle, fire, ambulance, or rescue equipment without a valid permit authorizing the use. A
permit to use a siren or lights as heretofore set out does not relieve the operator of the vehicle

HB 3334 3
so equipped with complying with all other traffic laws and regulations. Violation of this
section constitutes a class A misdemeanor.
✔